District of Columbia statutes.
47-4808

Expiration of credits.

Except for unused credits carried forward pursuant to § 47-4803(c) and for credits claimed under regulations promulgated by the Department consistent with the special rule set forth in section 42(f)(2) of the 1986 Internal Revenue Code , as amended and in effect for the taxable year, a qualified District of Columbia project shall not be eligible for any District of Columbia low-income housing tax credits for more than 11 taxable years.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990